Hawaii statutes.
[§672E-9] Additional construction defects.
A construction defect discovered after the notice of claim is served may not be
alleged in an action until the claimant has given the contractor:

(1) A written notice of claim regarding the alleged
defect under section 672E-3; and

(2) An opportunity to repair the construction defect
or reject the notice of claim under section 672E-4. [L 2004, c 119, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next